Utah statutes.
17C-4-108.   Amending a community development project area plan.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the requirements under this part
that apply to adopting a community development project area plan apply equally
to a proposed amendment of a community development project area plan as though
the amendment were a proposed project area plan.
(2) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), an adopted project area plan may be
amended without complying with the notice and public hearing requirements of
this part if the proposed amendment:
(i)  makes a minor adjustment in the legal description of a project area
boundary requested by a county assessor or county auditor to avoid
inconsistent property boundary lines; or
(ii)  subject to Subsection (2)(b), removes a parcel of real property from a
project area because the agency determines that inclusion of the parcel is no
longer necessary or desirable to the project area.
(b)  An amendment removing a parcel of real property from a community
development project area under Subsection (2)(a)(ii) may not be made without
the consent of the record property owner of the parcel being removed.
(3) (a)  An amendment approved by board resolution under this section may not
take effect until adopted by ordinance of the legislative body of the
community in which the project area that is the subject of the project area
plan being amended is located.
(b)  Upon a community legislative body passing an ordinance adopting an
amendment to a community development project area plan, the agency whose
project area plan was amended shall comply with the requirements of Sections
17C-4-106  and 17C-4-107 to the same extent as if the amendment were a project
area plan.
